Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Law enforcement agency” means an agency employing law enforcement  officers to
enforce criminal laws.
(2) “Law enforcement officer” means a member of the Oregon State Police, a sheriff or
a municipal police officer.
(3) “Officer-initiated pedestrian stop” means a detention of a pedestrian by a  law
enforcement officer, not associated with a call for service, when the detention results  in a
citation, an arrest or a consensual search of the pedestrian’s body or  property. The term
does not apply to detentions for routine searches performed at  the point of entry to or exit
from a controlled area.
(4) “Officer-initiated traffic stop” means a detention of a driver of a motor vehicle by  a
law enforcement officer,  not associated with a call for service, for the purpose of investi-
gating a suspected violation of the Oregon Vehicle Code.
(5) “Profiling” means the targeting of an individual by a  law enforcement agency or a law
enforcement officer, on  suspicion of the individual’s having violated a provision of law, based
solely on the individual’s real or perceived age, race, ethnicity, color, national  origin, lan-
guage, sex, gender identity,  sexual orientation, political affiliation, religion, homelessness or
disability, unless the agency or officer is acting on a suspect description or information  re-
lated to an identified or suspected violation of a provision of law.
(6) “Sexual orientation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.100.
SECTION 2.
(1) No later than July  1, 2018, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, in
consultation with the Department of State Police and the Department  of Justice, shall de-
velop and implement a standardized method to be used by law enforcement  officers to record
officer-initiated pedestrian stop and officer-initiated  traffic stop data. The standardized
method must require, and any form developed and used  pursuant to the standardized method
must provide for, the following data to be recorded for each stop:
(a) The date and time of the stop;
(b) The location of the stop;
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 1
(c) The race, ethnicity, age  and sex of the pedestrian or the operator of the motor vehicle
stopped, based on the observations of the law enforcement  officer responsible for reporting
the stop;
(d) The nature of, and the statutory citation for,  the alleged traffic violation, or other
alleged violation, that caused the stop to be made; and
(e) The disposition of the stop,  including whether a warning, citation or summons was
issued, whether  a search was conducted, the type of search conducted, whether anything
was found as a result of the search and whether an arrest was made.
(2) No later than July 1, 2018, the Department of Public Safety  Standards and Training,
in consultation with law enforcement agencies, shall develop and implement training  and
procedures to facilitate the collection of  officer-initiated pedestrian and traffic stop data
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Beginning on the dates described in subsection (4) of this section, all  law enforcement
agencies that engage in officer-initiated pedestrian or traffic stops shall record and  retain
the following data for each stop:
(a) The date and time of the stop;
(b) The location of the stop;
(c) The race, ethnicity, age  and sex of the pedestrian or the operator of the motor vehicle
stopped, based on the observations of the law enforcement  officer responsible for reporting
the stop;
(d) The nature of, and the statutory citation for,  the alleged traffic violation, or other
alleged violation, that caused the stop to be made; and
(e) The disposition of the stop,  including whether a warning, citation or summons was
issued, whether  a search was conducted, the type of search conducted, whether anything
was found as a result of the search and whether an arrest was made.
(4) Each law enforcement agency shall begin recording the  data described in subsection
(3) of this section as follows:
(a) An agency that employs 100 or more law enforcement officers  shall begin recording
no later than July 1, 2018.
(b) An agency that employs between 25 and 99 law enforcement officers shall  begin re-
cording no later than July 1, 2019.
(c) An agency that employs between one and 24  law enforcement officers shall begin re-
cording no later than July 1, 2020.
(5) Each law enforcement agency that engages in officer-initiated  traffic or pedestrian
stops shall report to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission the data recorded  pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section as follows:
(a) An agency that employs 100 or more law enforcement officers shall  report no later
than July 1, 2019, and at least annually thereafter.
(b) An agency that employs between 25 and  99 law enforcement officers shall report no
later than July 1, 2020, and at least annually thereafter.
(c) An agency that employs between one and 24 law enforcement officers shall report  no
later than July 1, 2021, and at least annually thereafter.
(6) Data acquired under this section shall be used only for statistical purposes and  not
for any other purpose. The data may not contain information that  reveals the identity of any
stopped individual or the identity  of any law enforcement officer. Data collected by law
enforcement agencies or held  by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission under this section
that may reveal the identity of any stopped individual or the identity of any law  enforcement
officer is exempt from public disclosure in any manner.
(7) The Department of  Justice, the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training
and the Department of State Police may adopt rules to carry out the  provisions of sections
1 to 4 of this 2017 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 2
SECTION 3.  (1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall review all  data, including
the prevalence and disposition of officer-initiated pedestrian and  traffic stops, reported by
law enforcement agencies pursuant to  section 2 of this 2017 Act in order to identify patterns
or practices of profiling.
(2) The commission  shall select one or more statistical analysis methodologies, deter-
mined to be consistent  with current best practices, with which to review the data as de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) No later than December 1, 2019,  and annually thereafter, the commission shall report
the results of the review  to the Governor, the Department of Public Safety Standards and
Training and, in the  manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the committees or interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary.
SECTION 4. (1) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training shall receive
and review reports provided to the department by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
pursuant to section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Upon receipt of a  report described in subsection (1) of this section, the department
may provide advice or technical assistance to any  law enforcement agency mentioned within
the report. Any advice or technical assistance provided shall be based  on best practices in
policing as  determined by the Oregon Center for Policing Excellence established in ORS
181A.660.
(3) Upon providing advice or technical assistance under this section, the department
shall, within a  reasonable amount of time, present a summary of the advice and assistance
given to the local public safety coordinating  council in the county in which the assisted law
enforcement agency is located. If the assisted law enforcement  agency is the Oregon State
Police, the presentation shall occur in Marion County. The presentation shall  be open to the
public, feature  live testimony by presenters and be held in accordance with ORS 192.610 to
192.690.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 131.925 is amended to read:
131.925. (1)(a) A law enforcement agency shall provide to  the Law Enforcement Contacts Policy
and Data Review Committee [ a copy of ] information concerning  each complaint  the agency re-
ceives alleging profiling ,[.]
[(b)] [ The law enforcement agency ] and shall notify the  committee of the disposition of the com-
plaint, in the manner described in this subsection .
(b) The law enforcement agency shall submit to the  committee a profiling complaint re-
port form summarizing each  profiling complaint and the disposition of the complaint, and a
copy of each profiling complaint, once each year no later than January 31.
(c) The law enforcement agency shall submit the form described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection even if the agency has not received any profiling complaints.
(d) The profiling  complaint report form and copies of profiling complaints submitted to
the committee may  not include personal information concerning the complainant or a law
enforcement officer except as to any personal information recorded on the form  as described
in subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(2)(a) A person may submit to the committee  a complaint alleging profiling and the committee
shall receive the complaints.
(b) The committee also shall receive complaints alleging profiling that are forwarded from  a law
enforcement agency.
(c) The committee shall forward a copy of each profiling complaint the committee receives  to
the law enforcement agency  employing the officer that is the subject of the complaint. The for-
warded complaint must include the name of the complainant unless the complainant  requests to re-
main anonymous, in which case the complainant’s name must be redacted.
(3)(a) The committee [ shall] may not release any personal  information concerning a complainant
or a law enforcement officer who is the subject of a profiling complaint.
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 3
(b) The personal information of complainants and of law enforcement officers who are  the sub-
ject of profiling complaints are exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.502.
[(c) As  used in this subsection, “personal information” has the meaning given that term in ORS
807.750.]
(4) The Department of State Police shall develop  a standardized profiling complaint re-
port form. The form must provide for recording the following information:
(a) A summary of total complaints and a certification that a law  enforcement agency’s
profiling policy conforms to ORS 131.920;
(b) A summary of each complaint received by the law enforcement agency,  including the
date, time and location of the incident and the disposition of the complaint; and
(c) To the extent known, the complainant’s gender, gender  identity, age, race, ethnicity,
sexual orientation, primary language, national  origin, religion, political affiliation, homeless
status and disability status, recorded in a manner that does not identify the complainant.
(5) As used  in this section, “personal information” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 807.750.
SECTION 6.  ORS 131.915 is amended to read:
131.915. As used in ORS 131.915 to 131.925:
(1) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) The Department of State Police;
(b) The Department of Justice;
(c) A district attorney’s office; and
(d) Any of the following that maintains a law enforcement unit as defined in ORS 181A.355:
(A) A political subdivision or an instrumentality of the State of Oregon.
(B) A municipal corporation of the State of Oregon.
(C) A tribal government.
(D) A university.
(2) “Law enforcement officer” means:
(a) A member of the Oregon State Police;
(b) A sheriff,  constable, marshal, municipal police officer or reserve officer or a police officer
commissioned by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125;
(c) An investigator of a district attorney’s office if the  investigator is or has been certified as
a law enforcement officer in this or any other state;
(d) An investigator of the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice;
(e) A humane special agent as defined in ORS 181A.345;
(f) A judicial marshal of the Security and Emergency Preparedness Office  of the Judicial De-
partment who is appointed under ORS 1.177 and trained pursuant to ORS 181A.540;
(g) A liquor enforcement inspector exercising authority described in ORS 471.775 (2); or
(h) An authorized tribal police officer as defined in ORS 181A.680.
(3) “Profiling” means [ that] the targeting of an individual by  a law enforcement  agency or a
law enforcement officer  [ targets an individual for ], on  suspicion of [ violating] the individual’s hav-
ing violated a provision of law , based solely on the  individual’s real or perceived  [ factor of the
individual’s] age,  race, ethnicity, color, national origin, language, [ gender] sex , gender identity,
sexual orientation, political affiliation, religion, homelessness or  disability, unless the agency or of-
ficer is acting on a suspect description or information related to an identified or suspected  violation
of a provision of law.
(4) “Sexual orientation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.100.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 131.920 is amended to read:
131.920. (1) All law enforcement agencies shall  have written policies and procedures prohibiting
profiling. The policies and procedures shall, at a minimum, include:
(a) A prohibition on profiling;
(b) Procedures allowing a complaint alleging profiling to be made to the agency:
(A) In person;
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 4
(B) In a writing signed by the complainant and  delivered by hand, postal mail, facsimile or
electronic mail; or
(C) By telephone, anonymously or through a third party;
(c) The provision of appropriate forms to use for submitting complaints alleging profiling;
(d) Procedures  for submitting a copy of each profiling complaint to the Law Enforcement Con-
tacts Policy and Data Review Committee and for receiving profiling complaints  forwarded from the
committee;  and
(e) Procedures for investigating all complaints alleging profiling.
(2) A law enforcement agency shall:
(a) Investigate all complaints alleging profiling that are received by  the agency or forwarded
from the committee.
(b) [Establish a time frame within which a complaint alleging profiling  may be made to the agency.
The time frame may not be fewer than 90 days or more than 180 days after the alleged commission of
profiling.] Accept for investigation a complaint  alleging profiling that is made to the agency
within 180 days of the alleged profiling incident.
(c) Respond to every complaint alleging profiling within a reasonable time after the con-
clusion of the investigation. The response must contain a statement of the final  disposition
of the complaint.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 181A.410, as amended by section 42, chapter 117, Oregon  Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
181A.410. (1) In accordance with any applicable provision of  ORS chapter 183, to promote
enforcement of law and fire services by improving  the competence of public safety personnel and
their support staffs, and in consultation with the agencies for  which the Board on Public Safety
Standards and Training and Department of Public  Safety Standards and Training provide standards,
certification, accreditation and training:
(a) The department shall recommend , and the board shall establish by rule , reasonable minimum
standards of physical, emotional,  intellectual and moral fitness for public safety personnel and in-
structors.
(b) The department shall recommend , and the board shall establish by rule , reasonable minimum
training for all levels of professional development, basic  through executive, including but not limited
to courses or subjects for instruction and qualifications for public safety personnel  and instructors.
Training requirements shall be consistent with the funding available in  the department’s
legislatively approved budget.
(c) The department, in consultation with the board, shall establish by rule a procedure or  pro-
cedures to be  used by law enforcement units, public or private safety agencies or the Oregon Youth
Authority to determine whether public safety personnel  meet minimum standards or have minimum
training.
(d) Subject to such terms and conditions as the department may impose, the  department shall
certify instructors and public safety personnel, except youth correction  officers, as being qualified
under the rules established by the board.
(e) The department shall deny  applications for training and deny, suspend and revoke certif-
ication in the manner provided in ORS 181A.630, 181A.640 and 181A.650 (1).
(f) The department  shall cause inspection of standards and training for instructors and public
safety personnel, except youth correction officers, to be made.
(g) The department may recommend , and the board may establish by rule , accreditation  stand-
ards, levels and categories for mandated and nonmandated public safety personnel training or  edu-
cational programs. The department and board, in  consultation, may establish to what extent training
or educational programs provided by an accredited university, college, community college or  public
safety agency may serve  as equivalent to mandated training or as a prerequisite to mandated
training. Programs offered by accredited universities, colleges or community colleges  may be con-
sidered equivalent to mandated training only in academic areas.
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 5
(h) The department  shall recommend, and the board shall establish by rule, an educa-
tional program that the board determines will be most effective in reducing profiling,  as de-
fined in ORS 131.915, by police officers  and reserve officers. The program must be required
at all levels  of training, including basic training and advanced, leadership and continuing
training.
(2) The department may:
(a) Contract or otherwise cooperate with any person or agency of  government for the procure-
ment of services or property;
(b) Accept gifts or grants of services or property;
(c) Establish fees for determining whether a training  or educational program meets the accred-
itation standards established under subsection (1)(g) of this section;
(d) Maintain and  furnish to law enforcement units and public and private safety agencies infor-
mation on applicants for appointment as  instructors or public safety personnel, except youth cor-
rection officers, in any part of the state; and
(e) Establish fees to  allow recovery of the full costs incurred in providing services to private
entities or in providing services as experts or expert witnesses.
(3) The department, in consultation with the board, may:
(a) Upon the request of a law enforcement unit or public safety agency, conduct surveys or aid
cities and counties to  conduct surveys through qualified public or private agencies and assist in the
implementation of any recommendations resulting from such surveys.
(b) Upon the request of  law enforcement units or public safety agencies, conduct studies and
make recommendations concerning means by which requesting units can coordinate or combine their
resources.
(c) Conduct and stimulate research to improve the police, fire service, corrections, adult parole
and probation, emergency medical dispatch and telecommunicator professions.
(d) Provide grants from funds appropriated or available therefor, to law  enforcement units,
public safety agencies, special districts,  cities, counties and private entities to carry out the pro-
visions of this subsection.
(e) Provide optional training programs for persons who operate lockups. The term  “lockup” has
the meaning given it in ORS 169.005.
(f) Provide optional training programs for public safety personnel and their support staffs.
(g) Enter into agreements with federal, state or other governmental agencies  to provide training
or other services in exchange for receiving training, fees or services of generally equivalent value.
(h) Upon the request of a law enforcement unit or public safety agency employing  public safety
personnel, except youth  correction officers, grant an officer, fire service professional, telecommu-
nicator or emergency medical dispatcher a multidiscipline certification consistent with the  minimum
requirements adopted or approved by  the board. Multidiscipline certification authorizes an officer,
fire service professional, telecommunicator or emergency medical dispatcher to work in any of the
disciplines for which the  officer, fire service professional, telecommunicator or emergency medical
dispatcher is certified. The provisions of ORS 181A.500, 181A.520 and 181A.530 relating  to lapse of
certification do not apply to an officer or fire service professional  certified under this paragraph as
long as the officer  or fire service professional maintains full-time employment in one of the certified
disciplines and meets the training standards established by the board.
(i) Establish fees and guidelines for the use of the facilities of the  training academy operated
by the  department and for nonmandated training provided to federal, state or other governmental
agencies, private entities or individuals.
(4) Pursuant to ORS chapter 183,  the board, in consultation with the department, shall adopt
rules necessary to carry out the board’s duties and powers.
(5) Pursuant to ORS chapter 183, the department, in consultation  with the board, shall adopt
rules necessary to carry out the department’s duties and powers.
(6) For efficiency,  board and department rules may be adopted jointly as a single set of combined
rules with the approval of the board and the department.
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 6
(7) The department shall obtain approval  of the board before submitting its legislative concepts,
Emergency Board request or agency request budget to the Oregon Department of  Administrative
Services.
(8) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training shall develop a training program
for conducting investigations required under ORS 181A.790.
SECTION 9.  ORS 475.752, as amended by section  59, chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2016, and section
26, chapter 21, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 302), is amended to read:
475.752. (1) Except as authorized by ORS 475.005 to  475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful
for any person to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance. Any person who violates  this sub-
section with respect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony, except as otherwise pro-
vided in ORS 475.886 and 475.890.
(b) A controlled substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class  B felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.878, 475.880, 475.882, 475.904 and 475.906.
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.904 and 475.906.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) Except as authorized in ORS  475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful for any
person to create or deliver a counterfeit substance. Any person who violates this subsection  with
respect  to:
(a) A counterfeit substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony.
(b) A counterfeit substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class B felony.
(c) A counterfeit substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony.
(d) A counterfeit substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A counterfeit substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(3) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally  to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of, a
practitioner while acting in  the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285  and 475.752 to 475.980. Any person who violates this subsection with re-
spect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule I,  is guilty of a Class [ B felony ] A misdemeanor , except
as otherwise provided in ORS  475.854, 475.874 and 475.894 and subsection (7) of this section .
(b) A controlled substance  in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class [ C felony ] A misdemeanor, except
as otherwise provided in ORS 475.824, 475.834 or 475.884 or subsection (8) of this section .
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a violation.
(4) In any prosecution under this section for  manufacture, possession or delivery of that plant
of the genus Lophophora commonly known as peyote, it is an affirmative defense that the  peyote is
being used or is intended for use:
(a) In connection with the good faith practice of a religious belief;
(b) As directly associated with a religious practice; and
(c) In a manner that is not dangerous to the health of the user or  others who are in the prox-
imity of the user.
(5) The affirmative defense created in subsection (4) of this section is not available to any person
who has  possessed or delivered the peyote while incarcerated in a correctional facility in this state.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, a person who unlawfully manufactures or
delivers a controlled substance in Schedule IV and who thereby causes death to another person  is
guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, causation is established when the  controlled substance plays
a substantial role in the death of the other person.
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 7
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section, unlawful possession of a controlled
substance in Schedule I is a Class B felony if:
(a) The person possesses a usable quantity of the controlled substance and:
(A) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(B) At the time of the possession, the person has two  or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(C) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(b) The person possesses:
(A) Forty or more user  units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount
of lysergic acid diethylamide; or
(B) Twelve grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a  detectable amount of
psilocybin or psilocin.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section, unlawful possession of a controlled
substance in Schedule II is  a Class C felony if the person possesses a usable quantity of the
controlled substance and:
(a) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(b) At the time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(c) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b).
SECTION 10.
 ORS 475.824 is amended to read:
475.824. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or  intentionally to possess methadone unless
the methadone was obtained directly  from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a prac-
titioner while acting  in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by
ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methadone is a Class [ C felony ] A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of methadone
is a Class C felony if:
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of methadone and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At the  time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses 40 or  more user units of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of methadone.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 475.834 is amended to read:
475.834. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess oxycodone  unless
the oxycodone was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of  a practi-
tioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of oxycodone is a Class [ C felony ] A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of oxycodone
is a Class C felony if:
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of oxycodone and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At the  time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses 40 or  more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of oxycodone.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 475.854 is amended to read:
475.854. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess heroin.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of heroin is a Class [ B felony ] A misdemeanor .
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 8
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  unlawful possession of heroin is a
Class B felony if:
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of heroin and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At the time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions  for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses one gram or more of a mixture or substance containing  a de-
tectable amount of heroin.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 475.874 is amended to read:
475.874. (1)  It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a  Class [ B felony ] A
misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, unlawful possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class B felony if:
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At the  time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses one gram or more or five or more pills, tablets or  capsules of
a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of:
(i) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(ii) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(iii) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 475.884 is amended to read:
475.884. (1)  It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess cocaine unless
the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or  order of a practi-
tioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of cocaine is a Class [ C felony ] A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of cocaine  is a
Class C felony if:
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of cocaine and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At the time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions  for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses two grams or more of a mixture or  substance containing a
detectable amount of cocaine.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 475.894 is amended to read:
475.894. (1) It is unlawful  for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess methamphetamine
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a
practitioner while acting in  the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine is a Class [ C felony ] A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession  of metham-
phetamine is a Class C felony if:
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of methamphetamine and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 9
(ii) At the  time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses  two grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of methamphetamine.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 475.005 is amended to read:
475.005. As used in ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to  475.980, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Abuse” means the repetitive excessive use of a  drug short of dependence, without legal or
medical supervision, which may have a detrimental effect on the individual or society.
(2) “Administer” means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by  injection,
inhalation, ingestion or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or an authorized agent thereof; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(3) “Administration” means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Depart-
ment of Justice, or its successor agency.
(4) “Agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of  a man-
ufacturer, distributor or dispenser. It does not include a  common or contract carrier, public
warehouseman or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.
(5) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(6) “Controlled substance”:
(a) Means a drug or its immediate precursor classified in Schedules  I through V under the fed-
eral Controlled Substances Act,  21 U.S.C. 811 to 812, as modified under ORS 475.035. The use of the
term “precursor” in  this paragraph does not control and is not controlled by the use of the term
“precursor” in ORS 475.752 to 475.980.
(b) Does not mean industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.300, or  industrial hemp commodities
or products.
(7) “Counterfeit substance” means  a controlled substance or its container or labeling, which,
without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint,  number
or device, or any likeness thereof,  of a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser other than the person
who in fact manufactured, delivered or dispensed the substance.
(8) “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive  or attempted transfer, other than by
administering or dispensing, from one person to another of a controlled  substance, whether or not
there is an agency relationship.
(9) “Device” means instruments, apparatus or contrivances, including their components, parts
or accessories, intended:
(a) For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in humans  or
animals; or
(b) To affect the structure of any function of the body of humans or animals.
(10) “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to  an ultimate user or research subject
by or  pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, and includes the prescribing, administering,
packaging, labeling or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.
(11) “Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.
(12) “Distributor” means a person who delivers.
(13) “Drug” means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States  Pharmacopoeia, official
Homeopathic  Pharmacopoeia  of the United States or official National Formulary, or any supplement
to any of them;
(b) Substances intended  for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of
disease in humans or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the  structure or any function of the body of
humans or animals; and
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 10
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of  any article specified in paragraph (a), (b) or
(c) of this subsection; however, the term does not include devices or their  components, parts or ac-
cessories.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic transmission”  means a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including computer  terminals or other equipment or
mechanisms linked by telephone or microwave relays, or any similar apparatus having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion
or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction  from substances
of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination  of ex-
traction  and  chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or la-
beling or relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include the preparation or
compounding of a controlled substance:
(a) By a practitioner as an  incident to administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner, or by an authorized agent under the  practitioner’s supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(16) “Marijuana”:
(a) Except as provided in this subsection,  means all parts of the plant Cannabis family
Moraceae, whether growing or  not; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every com-
pound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant or its resin.
(b) Does not mean the mature stalks  of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake
made from  the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the mature  stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the
sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination.
(c) Does not mean industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.300,  or industrial hemp commodities
or products.
(17) “Person” includes a government subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust or  any
other legal entity.
(18) “Practitioner” means physician, dentist, veterinarian, scientific investigator,  certified nurse
practitioner, physician assistant or other person licensed,  registered or otherwise permitted by law
to dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course
of professional practice or research in this state but does not include a pharmacist or a pharmacy.
(19) “Prescription” means a written, oral or electronically transmitted direction, given  by a
practitioner for the preparation and use of  a drug. When the context requires, “prescription” also
means the drug prepared under such written, oral or  electronically transmitted direction. Any label
affixed to a drug prepared under  written, oral or electronically transmitted direction shall promi-
nently display a warning that the removal thereof is prohibited by law.
(20) “Production” includes  the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting of a
controlled substance.
(21) “Research” means an activity conducted by  the person registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to a protocol approved by  the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(22) “Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a  controlled substance for the use
of the person or for the use of a member of the household of the  person or for administering to an
animal owned by the person or by a member of the household of the person.
(23) “Usable quantity” means:
(a) An  amount of a controlled substance that is sufficient to physically weigh independent
of its packaging and that does not fall below the uncertainty of the measuring scale; or
(b) An amount of a controlled substance that has not  been deemed unweighable, as de-
termined by a Department of  State Police forensic laboratory, due to the circumstances of
the controlled substance.
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 11
[(23)] (24) “Within 1,000 feet” means a straight line measurement in a radius extending for 1,000
feet or less in every  direction from a specified location or from any point on the boundary line of
a specified unit of property.
SECTION 17.  ORS 423.478 is amended to read:
423.478. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Operate prisons for offenders sentenced to terms of incarceration for more than 12 months;
(b) Provide central information and data services sufficient to:
(A) Allow tracking of offenders; and
(B) Permit analysis of correlations between sanctions, supervision,  services and programs, and
future criminal conduct; and
(c) Provide interstate compact administration and jail inspections.
(2) Subject to ORS 423.483, the county, in  partnership with the department, shall assume re-
sponsibility for community-based supervision, sanctions  and services for offenders convicted of felo-
nies or designated drug-related misdemeanors  who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January 1, 1997, by a court or the State Board  of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to  12 months or less incarceration for violation of a condition of parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; [ and] or
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(3) Notwithstanding the fact that the court has sentenced a person to a term of  incarceration,
when an  offender is committed to the custody of the supervisory authority of a county under ORS
137.124 (2) or (4), the supervisory authority may execute the sentence by imposing  sanctions other
than incarceration if deemed appropriate by the  supervisory authority. If the supervisory authority
releases a person from custody under this subsection and the  person is required to report as a sex
offender under ORS 163A.010, the supervisory authority, as a condition of release,  shall order the
person to report to  the Department of State Police, a city police department or a county sheriff’s
office or to the supervising agency, if any:
(a) When the person is released;
(b) Within 10 days of a change of residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date;
(d) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries  on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or  attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
(4) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Attends,” “institution of higher  education,” “works” and “carries on a vocation” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” means:
(A) Unlawful possession of a Schedule I controlled substance under ORS 475.752 (3)(a);
(B) Unlawful possession of a Schedule II controlled substance under ORS 475.752 (3)(b);
(C) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 (2)(a);
(D) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 (2)(a);
(E) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 (2)(a);
(F) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS 475.874 (2)(a);
(G) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 (2)(a); or
(H) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 (2)(a).
SECTION 18.
 ORS 423.525, as amended  by section 67, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 12
423.525. (1) A county, group of counties or intergovernmental  corrections entity shall apply to
the Director of  the Department of Corrections in a manner and form prescribed by the director for
funding made available under ORS 423.500 to 423.560. The application shall include a community
corrections  plan.  The Department of Corrections shall provide consultation and technical assistance
to counties to aid in the development and implementation of community corrections plans.
(2)(a) From  July 1, 1995, until June 30, 1999, a county, group of counties or intergovernmental
corrections entity may make application requesting funding for the construction,  acquisition, ex-
pansion or remodeling of  correctional facilities to serve the county, group of counties or intergov-
ernmental corrections entity. The department  shall review the application for funding of
correctional facilities in  accordance with criteria that consider design, cost, capacity, need, operat-
ing efficiency and viability based on the  county’s, group of counties’ or intergovernmental cor-
rections entity’s ability to provide for ongoing operations.
(b)(A) If the application is approved, the department shall present the  application with a request
to finance the facility with financing agreements  to the State Treasurer and the Director of the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph  (B)
of this  paragraph, upon approval of the request by the State Treasurer and the Director of the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the facility may be financed with  financing agree-
ments, and certificates of participation issued pursuant thereto, as provided in ORS 283.085  to
283.092. All decisions approving or denying applications  and requests for financing under this sec-
tion are final. No such decision is subject to judicial review of any kind.
(B) If requests to finance county correctional facility projects  are submitted after February 22,
1996, and the requests have not been approved by the department on the  date a session of the
Legislative Assembly convenes, the requests are  also subject to the approval of the Legislative As-
sembly.
(c) After approval but prior to the solicitation of bids or proposals for the construction  of a
project, the county, group of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity  and the department
shall enter into a written agreement that determines the procedures,  and the parties responsible, for
the awarding of contracts and the administration of the construction  project for the approved
correctional facility. If  the parties are unable to agree on the terms of the written agreement, the
Governor shall decide the terms of the agreement. The Governor’s decision is final.
(d) After approval of a construction project, the administration of  the project shall be conducted
as provided in the agreement required by  paragraph (c) of this subsection. The agreement must re-
quire at  a minimum that the county, group of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity shall
submit to the department any change  order or alteration of the design of the project that, singly
or in the aggregate, reduces the capacity of the correctional facility or  materially changes the ser-
vices or functions of the project. The change order or alteration is not effective until  approved by
the department. In reviewing the change order  or alteration, the department shall consider whether
the implementation of the change order or alteration will have any material  adverse impact on the
parties to any financing agreements or the holders of any certificates of participation issued to  fund
county correctional facilities under this section.  In making its decision, the department may rely on
the opinions of the Department of Justice, bond counsel or professional financial advisers.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS  283.085, for purposes of this section, “financing agreement” means a
lease purchase agreement, an installment sale agreement, a  loan agreement or any other agreement
to finance a correctional facility described in this section, or  to refinance a previously executed fi-
nancing agreement for the financing of a correctional facility. The state is not required to own or
operate a correctional facility in order to finance it under ORS 283.085 to 283.092  and this section.
The state, an intergovernmental corrections entity, county or group of counties may enter into any
agreements, including, but not limited to, leases  and subleases, that are reasonably necessary or
generally accepted by the financial community for  purposes of acquiring or securing financing as
authorized by this section. In financing county correctional  facilities under this section, “property
rights” as used in ORS 283.085  includes leasehold mortgages of the state’s rights under leases of
correctional facilities from counties.
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 13
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law,  county charter or ordinance, a county may
convey or lease to  the State of Oregon, acting by and through the Department of Corrections, title
to interests in, or a lease of, any real property, facilities or personal property owned  by the county
for the purpose of  financing the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of a correctional
facility. Upon the payment of all principal  and interest on, or upon any other satisfaction of, the
financing agreement used to  finance the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of a
correctional facility, the  state shall reconvey its interest in, or terminate and surrender its leasehold
of, the property or facilities, including the financed construction, acquisition, expansion or  remod-
eling, to the county. In  addition to any authority granted by ORS 283.089, for the purposes of ob-
taining financing, the state may enter into agreements under which the state may grant  to trustees
or lenders leases, subleases and other security interests in county property  conveyed or leased to
the state under this subsection and in the property or facilities financed by financing agreements.
(5) In connection with the financing of  correctional facilities, the Director of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services may bill the Department  of Corrections, and the Department
of Corrections  shall pay the amounts billed, in the same manner as provided in ORS 283.089. As
required by ORS 283.091, the Department of Corrections and the Oregon  Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall include in the Governor’s budget all amounts that will  be due in each fiscal
period under financing  agreements for correctional facilities. Amounts payable by the state under
a financing agreement for  the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of a correctional
facility are limited to available funds as defined in ORS 283.085, and no lender, trustee,  certificate
holder or county has any claim or recourse against any funds of the state other than available funds.
(6) The director shall adopt rules that may be  necessary for the administration, evaluation and
implementation of ORS  423.500 to 423.560. The standards shall be sufficiently flexible to foster the
development of new and improved  supervision or rehabilitative practices and maximize local control.
(7) When a county assumes responsibility under ORS 423.500 to 423.560  for correctional services
previously provided by the department, the county and  the department shall enter into an inter-
governmental  agreement  that includes a local community corrections plan consisting of program
descriptions, budget allocation, performance objectives and methods of evaluating  each correctional
service to be provided by the county. The performance objectives must include  in dominant part
reducing future criminal conduct. The methods of evaluating services must include,  to the extent
of available information systems resources, the collection and  analysis of data sufficient to deter-
mine the apparent effect of the services on future criminal conduct.
(8) All  community corrections plans shall comply with rules adopted pursuant to ORS 423.500
to 423.560, and shall include but need not be limited to an outline of the  basic structure and the
supervision, services and local sanctions to be applied to offenders convicted of felonies  and des-
ignated drug-related misdemeanors who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January 1, 1997, by a court or the State Board  of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision  to 12 months or less incarceration for a violation of a condition of parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; and
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(9) All community corrections plans shall  designate a community corrections manager of the
county or counties and shall provide that  the administration of community corrections under ORS
423.500 to 423.560 shall be under such manager.
(10) No amendment to or modification  of a county-approved community corrections plan shall
be placed in effect without prior notice to the director for purposes of statewide data collection and
reporting.
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 14
(11) The obligation of  the state to provide funding and the scheduling for providing funding of
a project approved  under this section is dependent upon the ability of the state to access public
security markets to sell financing agreements.
(12) No later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Evaluate the community corrections policy established in ORS 423.475,  423.478, 423.483 and
423.500 to 423.560; and
(b) Assess the effectiveness of local revocation options.
(13) As  used in this section, “designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning
given that term in ORS 423.478.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 137.633 is amended to read:
137.633. (1) A person convicted of a felony or a designated drug-related  misdemeanor  and
sentenced to probation or to the legal and  physical custody of the supervisory authority under ORS
137.124 (2) is eligible for a reduction in the  period of probation or local control post-prison super-
vision for complying with terms of probation or post-prison  supervision, including the payment of
restitution and participation in recidivism reduction programs.
(2) The maximum reduction  under this section may not exceed 50 percent of the period of pro-
bation or local control post-prison supervision imposed.
(3) A reduction under this section may not be used to shorten the period of  probation or local
control post-prison supervision to less than six months.
(4)(a) The Department of Corrections shall adopt  rules to carry out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
(b) The supervisory authority shall comply with the rules adopted under this section.
(5) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the  meaning given that term in ORS
423.478.
(b) “Local control post-prison supervision” means post-prison supervision that is supervised by
a local supervisory authority pursuant to ORS 144.101.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 51.050 is amended to read:
51.050. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section,  in addition to the criminal jurisdiction
of justice courts already conferred upon and exercised by them, justice  courts have jurisdiction of
all offenses committed or triable in their respective counties. The jurisdiction conveyed  by this
section is concurrent with any jurisdiction that may be exercised by a circuit  court or municipal
court.
(2) In any justice court that has not become a court of record  under ORS 51.025, a defendant
charged with a misdemeanor shall be notified immediately after entering a plea of not guilty of  the
right of the defendant to have  the matter transferred to the circuit court for the county where the
justice court is located. The election shall be made within 10 days after  the plea of not guilty is
entered, and the justice shall immediately transfer the case to the appropriate court.
(3) A justice court does not have jurisdiction over the trial of  any felony  or a designated
drug-related misdemeanor as defined in ORS  423.478. Except as provided in ORS 51.037, a justice
court does not have jurisdiction over offenses created by the charter or ordinance of any city.
SECTION 21.  ORS 221.339 is amended to read:
221.339. (1) A municipal court has concurrent jurisdiction with circuit  courts and justice courts
over all violations committed or triable in the city where the court is located.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, municipal courts have concur-
rent jurisdiction with circuit courts and justice courts over misdemeanors  committed or triable in
the city. Municipal courts may exercise the jurisdiction conveyed by this section without a  charter
provision or ordinance authorizing that exercise.
(3) Municipal courts have no jurisdiction over felonies  or  designated drug-related
misdemeanors as defined in ORS 423.478 .
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 15
(4) A city may limit the exercise of jurisdiction over  misdemeanors by a municipal court under
this section  by the adoption of a charter provision or ordinance, except that municipal courts must
retain concurrent jurisdiction with circuit courts over:
(a) Misdemeanors created by the city’s own charter or by  ordinances adopted by the city, as
provided in ORS 3.132; and
(b) Traffic crimes as defined by ORS 801.545.
(5) Subject to the powers and duties of the Attorney General under  ORS 180.060, the city at-
torney has authority to prosecute a violation of any offense created by statute that is subject to  the
jurisdiction of a municipal court, including  any appeal, if the offense is committed or triable in the
city. The prosecution shall be in the name of the state. The city attorney shall have all powers of
a district attorney in prosecutions under this subsection.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 161.615 is amended to read:
161.615. Sentences for misdemeanors shall be for a definite term. The court shall fix the  term
of imprisonment within the following maximum limitations:
(1) For a Class A misdemeanor, [ 1 year ] 364 days.
(2) For a Class B misdemeanor, 6 months.
(3) For a Class C misdemeanor, 30 days.
(4) For an unclassified misdemeanor, as provided in the statute defining the crime.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 419C.501 is amended to read:
419C.501. (1) The court shall fix the duration of any disposition made pursuant to this  chapter
and the duration may be for an indefinite period. Any placement in the legal custody of the De-
partment of Human Services or the Oregon Youth Authority  under ORS 419C.478 or placement un-
der the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board under  ORS 419C.529 shall be for an
indefinite period. However, the period of institutionalization or commitment may not exceed:
(a) The period of time  specified in the statute defining the crime for an act that would constitute
an unclassified misdemeanor if committed by an adult;
(b) Thirty  days for an act that would constitute a Class C misdemeanor if committed by an adult;
(c) Six months for an act that would constitute a Class  B misdemeanor if committed by an adult;
(d) [ One year ] Three hundred sixty-four days  for an act that would constitute a Class  A
misdemeanor if committed by an adult;
(e) Five years for an act that would constitute a Class C felony if committed by an adult;
(f) Ten years for an act that would constitute a Class B felony if committed by an adult;
(g) Twenty years for  an act that would constitute a Class A felony if committed by an adult;
and
(h) Life for a young person who was found to have committed an act that,  if committed by an
adult would constitute murder or any aggravated form of murder under ORS 163.095 or 163.115.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1)(h) of this section, the period  of any disposition may not
extend beyond the date on which the young person or youth offender becomes 25 years of age.
SECTION 24.
The Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission shall study the effect that the
reduction of certain unlawful possession of a  controlled substance offenses from a felony to
a misdemeanor has had on the criminal justice  system, rates of recidivism and the compo-
sition of  the population of persons convicted of felony offenses. The commission shall submit
a report detailing the results of the study to the interim committees of  the Legislative As-
sembly related to  the judiciary in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 no later than Sep-
tember 15, 2018.
SECTION 25.  ORS 161.570 is amended to read:
161.570. (1) As used in this section, “nonperson felony” has the meaning given  that term in the
rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(2) A district attorney may elect to treat a Class C  nonperson felony or a violation of ORS
475.752 [(3)(a)] (7), 475.854 (2)(b) or 475.874  (2)(b) as a Class A  misdemeanor. The election must be
made by the  district attorney orally or in writing at the time of the first appearance of the defend-
ant. If a district attorney elects to treat a Class  C felony or a violation of ORS 475.752 [ (3)(a)] (7) ,
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 16
475.854 (2)(b)  or 475.874  (2)(b)  as a Class A misdemeanor  under this subsection, the court shall
amend the accusatory instrument to reflect the charged offense as a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) If, at some time after the first appearance of a defendant charged with a Class C  nonperson
felony or a  violation of ORS 475.752 [ (3)(a)] (7), 475.854 (2)(b) or 475.874  (2)(b), the district attorney
and the defendant agree to treat  the charged offense as a Class A misdemeanor, the court may allow
the offense to be treated as a Class A misdemeanor by stipulation of the parties.
(4) If a Class C felony or a violation  of ORS 475.752 [ (3)(a)] (7), 475.854 (2)(b) or 475.874  (2)(b)
is treated as a Class A misdemeanor under this section, the court shall clearly denominate  the of-
fense as a Class A misdemeanor in any judgment entered in the matter.
(5) If no election or stipulation is made under this section, the case proceeds as a felony.
(6) Before a district attorney may make an election under  subsection (2) of this section, the
district attorney shall adopt written  guidelines for determining when and under what circumstances
the election may be made. The district attorney shall apply the guidelines uniformly.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 161.635, the  fine that a court may impose upon conviction of a
misdemeanor under this section may not:
(a) Be less than the minimum fine established by ORS 137.286 for a felony; or
(b) Exceed the amount provided in ORS 161.625 for the class of  felony receiving Class A
misdemeanor treatment.
SECTION 26.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission by section 1, chapter , Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5005), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, is increased
by $347,351 for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (4), chapter , Oregon Laws  2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5031), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for administrative ser-
vices, agency support, criminal justice information services  and office of the State Fire
Marshal, is increased by $780,418 for the purpose of implementing the provisions  of this 2017
Act.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter , Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House
Bill 5031),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  State
Police for  administrative services, agency support, criminal justice information services and
office of the State Fire Marshal, is increased by $750,000 for the purpose of  implementing the
provisions of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter , Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House
Bill 5034),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training, for operations, is increased by $431,330 for  the purpose of
implementing the provisions of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 30.
(1) The amendments to ORS 475.005, 475.752,  475.824, 475.834, 475.854,
475.874, 475.884 and 475.894 by sections 9 to 16 of this 2017 Act apply to unlawful possession
of a controlled substance offenses committed on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 161.615 by section 22 of this 2017 Act apply to sentences
imposed on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 419C.501  by section 23 of this 2017 Act apply to findings that
a youth offender is within the jurisdiction of  the court under ORS 419C.005 that are made
on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 17
SECTION 31. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2355 (HB 2355-B) Page 18